Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
Number of Reviews
27

Author
Steve Rhodes
Welcome back to yesteryear.  A time when a boy and his robot could take
center stage in their own cartoon adventure without benefit of
wisecracking animals.  When one could use the word wholesome as a
compliment without any satirical or negative connotations.  An era when
adult strangers cheerfully and without derision refer to youngsters as
buckaroo, slugger, tiger and chief.
Set in the small town of Rockwell (think Norman Rockwell), Maine, THE
IRON GIANT takes place in 1957, a famous period in our nation's history.
At the height of the cold war, the kids are having fun watching hokey,
science-fiction television shows at home and comically serious
duck-and-cover films at school.
One night, 9-year-old Hogarth Hughes (Eli Marienthal) finds out that
someone has made a metal meal of his rooftop antenna.  Following a trail
through the forest, he ends up meeting and saving the life of a giant
robot from space, which he calls the Iron Giant (Vin Diesel).  "It's the
greatest discovery since television, I guess," he proudly declares.
This lovable hunk of hardware is drawn as a homage to what we thought of
robots back then.  The head on his 100-foot body is a little too small,
his mechanisms are more mechanical than electrical and he possesses
certain special powers that even he doesn't seem to know about.  Most of
all, he has these awesome sounds.  When he walks, there is the clunk of
huge, hollow metal cylinders hitting the ground, as if the Tin Man from
THE WIZARD OF OZ had been crossed with Godzilla.  Once the gentle giant
learns to speak, his precious, raspy voice sounds like it comes from
deep within an empty, metal well.
"Mom, you won't believe this," Hogarth tells his mother (Jennifer
Aniston).  "Something just ate our antenna."  Yes, he's right.  She
doesn't, which is, of course, the traditional adult response.
When one of the locals reports a sighting of the alien to "the
government," Kent Mansley (Christopher McDonald), a square shooter with
a long, pointed jaw and a pipe, shows up to investigate.  "While you're
snoozing in your jammies, back in Washington we're wide awake and
worried," the humorously supercilious Kent lectures Hogarth.
The story is filled with good-spirited fun as when the robot decides to
join Hogarth by trying a cannonball dive into the lake.  This causes a
Tsunami of a wave that wipes out Hogarth's older friend, Dean McCoppin,
lounging nearby on the shore.
Dean, voiced by Harry Connick Jr., is one of the more unusual characters
to grace such a story.  A take-off on famous rebel James Dean, Dean is a
laid-back beatnik artist, who runs a junkyard in order to collect enough
raw material to create his metal sculptures.
The movie, which dares to spend more time with tenderness than
slapstick, has a wonderfully touching ending.  One could dream of a
world in which there were more good kids' movies like this one -- ones
with simple but endearing charms that warm the heart.  Motion pictures
can and should be about more than special effects and gross humor.  THE
IRON GIANT is a start.
THE IRON GIANT runs 1:26.  It is rated PG for a few cuss words -- as in
"What the hell?" -- that are clearly thrown in for the sole purpose of
avoiding a G rating.  Only some of the scary images might briefly
frighten the youngest viewers.  In our packed audience, filled with kids
of all ages, none seemed afraid.
My son Jeffrey, age 10, thought it was a "really sweet movie" and gave
it ** 1/2.  The only part he didn't like was that they never explained
where the robot came from.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Louis Proyect
It is 1957. Home alone, the 10 year old Hogarth Hughes is eating
Twinkies and watching television, while his waitress mother is at
work. He is enrapt by a scene in a scary late-night science fiction
movie about brains crawling across a laboratory floor. Since reports
have been circulating about the arrival of a UFO into the ocean waters
near his small seacoast town of Rockwell, Maine, the self-reliant
Hogarth is prepared for nearly anything. When all of a sudden the
reception on the television begins to fade, he goes to the rooftop and
investigates. Somebody or something has taken a huge bite out the
antenna. After noticing immense tracks in the dirt leading away from
his house, he descends in the woods with a BB gun in hand to confront
what must be a space monster.
So begins a powerful animated film titled "The Iron Giant," based on a
novel by Ted Hughes, England's poet laureate, written in 1968. Hughes,
who died in 1998, wrote "The Iron Man" to comfort his young son after
the death of his mother, the poet Sylvia Plath, in 1963. It is about,
among other things, the persistence of life in the midst of death.
Surely enough he discovers an immense iron giant robot eating metal
parts from an electrical power station in the dead of night, as
languidly as a gorilla nibbling on vegetation. When the iron giant
accidentally touches a generator, he is jolted by a huge electrical
charge which threatens to kill it. Making a snap decision--one that
sets the plot in motion for the remainder of this great animated
film--Hogarth runs through falling metal and arcs of high-voltage
electricity to shut down the power. After the iron giant regains
consciousness, he follows Hogarth home. Although immensely powerful,
the giant is like a small child needing protection in an unfamiliar
setting. As it turns out, the iron giant is the source of the rumors
flying about Rockwell since it is he who has plunged into the ocean a
few days earlier and swum to shore. Wandering about the woods of rural
Maine, he has been subsisting on metal wherever he can find it--in
parked cars or power stations.
Hogarth soon learns that Kent Mansley, a government agent and the
villain of the movie, is on the tracks of the iron giant, since
anything un-American in 1957 is considered a threat to national
security, whether it comes from Russia or outer space. After
discovering that the giant is harmless unless attacked, Hogarth
becomes his best friend and protector. Hidden away in the barn next to
his house, the boy is teaching the robot the ways of the planet earth
mainly through comic books like Superman and Mad. As he turns through
their pages, we learn that their omnipresent theme is the threat of
nuclear war. In one story, Superman defends the planet earth against a
radioactive monster. The iron giant, who is slowly learning to speak,
tells Hogarth that he wants to be like Superman. At school, the threat
of nuclear war is every bit as real as it is in the comic books and in
science fiction movies. They watch a movie called "Duck and Cover"
that shows children how easy it is to survive a nuclear attack. Just
duck and cover.
Hogarth finds an unlikely ally in the local beatnik sculptor Dean, who
lives and works at a junkyard. He works there because he can use the
scrap iron in his "far out" sculpture. After Hogarth has introduced
him to the iron giant, Dean wastes no time putting him to work. He
directs the giant to stack old cars one on top of another in a
monumental sculpture. Those that aren't used in the artwork go
directly into the giant's stomach. Dean, who is the polar opposite of
Mansley, is a forerunner of the cultural and political changes that
would emerge in the 1960s. He was one of the rebels "who distributed
Supercommunist pamphlets in Union  Square weeping and undressing while
the sirens of Los Alamos wailed them down," as Allen Ginsberg put it
in the landmark poem "Howl".
This film has all the appeal of "ET" or "Terminator part two". The
myth of a child taking an extraterrestrial or dangerous monster under
his wing and teaching him the ways of his world is vastly alluring.
What gives "The Iron Giant" additional appeal is that this
relationship is set against the very real backdrop of global
annihilation in the 1950s, when the threat of all-out nuclear war was
very much on the mind of all children, including myself. Hogarth
Hughes was exactly the kind of animated feature character I could have
identified with, and one, I'm sure, that contemporary ten year olds,
both male and female, can identify with. The movie offers an
alternative to the sentimental pap of the Disney studio as well.
Instead of presenting challenges drawn from the world of fairy tales
with a "politically correct" overlay, director Brad Bird confronts the
real evil that lived and lives in American society. The voice of
Hogarth Hughes is done by 12 year old Elie Marienthal, while Harry
Connick Jr. is Dean and Christopher MacDonald is the government agent
Mansley.
Marxist discussion is at: www.panix.com/~lnp3/marxism.html

Author
Scott Renshaw
     After flaming out spectacularly in its last few attempts at feature
animation -- gems like QUEST FOR CAMELOT and THE KING AND I -- Warner
Bros. finally figured out how to guarantee a decent story: they re-made
E.T. as a cartoon.  Technically, of course, that's not what THE IRON MAN
is.  It's a loose adaptation of poet Ted Hughes' story "The Iron Man," set
here in coastal Maine circa 1957.  The protagonist is 9-year-old Hogarth
Hughes (voice of Eli Marienthal), imaginative only child of a single
mother (Jennifer Aniston).  In the tense wake of Sputnik's launch, Hogarth
discovers a 50-foot-tall robot in the woods near his home.  The
metal-eating giant (Vin Diesel) has no memory of his origin or his
purpose, leading Hogarth to act as his caretaker.  Unfortunately,
over-zealous government agent Kent Mansley (Christopher McDonald) won't
rest until he discovers the source of local rumors about a monster from
places unknown...possibly the Communists.
     On a fairly superficial level, THE IRON MAN is a Cold War allegory
about paranoia turned against anything unfamiliar.  Screenwriter Tim
McCanlies and director Brad Bird drop in little tidbits of period detail
-- Hogarth's fascination with radiation/mutation films, his friendship
with a beatnik scrapyard owner/artist (Harry Connick Jr.) -- but they
don't really take full advantage of their setting.  The decision to set
the film in 1957 Maine seems fairly arbitrary, especially since Hughes'
book was not.  A bit more successful is the thematic treatment of the
giant as a weapon that learns how to be human.  Some viewers may shift in
their seats at the "guns kill" message-mongering, but it's intriguing to
see a family film tackling the notion of a sentient being accepting
responsibility for its own moral choices, and finding heroism in the
process.
     THE IRON GIANT ultimately does prove entertaining not because of its
astute observations about 1950s America or gun control, but because it's a
classic "boy and his dog" story -- E.T. seasoned with a generous dose of
"Johnny Sokko and Giant Robot."  The giant is given the personality of a
curious child, and the relationship between Hogarth and the giant earns
smiles from the lad's frustrations at "training" his mammoth companion.
The set-ups are familiar, but familiarity doesn't have to mean laziness.
Yes, there is a sinister government figure who wants the alien for his own
purposes; Christopher McDonald also delivers a snappy vocal performance to
spark Mansley's over-zealous patriotism.  Yes, the alien causes an
unexpected ruckus when he mimics some human activities; the scene in which
the giant executes a perfect "cannonball" into a lake also delivers a big
laugh.  As directed by "The Simpsons" and "King of the Hill" veteran Bird,
THE IRON GIANT has a slightly subversive sense of humor and a lively pace,
giving the oft-told tale its own unique spice.  It's E.T.-lite, to be
sure, but it still pushes the right buttons.
     On a technical level, THE IRON GIANT may not dazzle like some recent
Disney features.  While the integration of the digitally-created giant and
the conventionally-drawn characters is seamless, the backgrounds come out
a bit flat and the colors somewhat muted.  Yet the toned-down animation
may actually work to THE IRON GIANT's advantage.  There's more innocence
to the character design, more simple charm in the laid-back direction.
I'm not sure THE IRON GIANT earns the big emotional crescendo it's looking
for when Hogarth finally stares skyward at the giant and says "I love
you," but the fundamental appeal of the relationship between a lonely boy
and his alien puppy is always in effect.  If it's true that there are no
new stories to tell, the success of a film is always about the time the
filmmakers invest in telling the old stories well.  So E.T. is a 50-foot
robot this time around.  You'll still probably be pulling for him to turn
on his heartlight.

Author
Chuck Schwartz
CrankyCriticŽ movie reviews:The Iron Giant
Rated [PG]
Starring Eli Marienthal, Harry Connick Jr., Jennifer Aniston, Vin
Diesel, Christopher McDonald and John Mahoney
Screenplay by Tim McCanlies and Brad Bird
Based on the book The Iron Man by Ted Hughes
Directed by Brad Bird
website: http://www.theirongiant.com
IN SHORT: The first "must see" movie of the summer. . .and how many
times do you see that pair of words in a CrankyCriticŽ review?
Long time readers know that Cranky is an admitted 'toon-head. They also
know that he's been waiting for the one animated feature that could
appeal to adults as well as children, without forcing us to sit through
bad songs or a marketing machine's cute anthropomorphic, animated
sidekicks. Princess Mononoke, coming in October, is definitely not for
little kidlets. Disney's Tarzan came close, but didn't leave me with
lump in my throat and a pounding in my chest as the end credits hit, as
was the case with what I'll declare to be my now discovered Holy Grail
of Animation. It is called The Iron Giant, based upon a book written by
England's poet laureate Ted Hughes for his children, after the death of
their mother, the poet Sylvia Plath. The Who's Pete Townshend adapted
the story into rock opera format a number of years ago. This version is
created under the eye of animator/director Brad Bird, who studied at
Disney, did his teevee writing/directing/creative consulting work on The
Simpsons, The Critic and King of the Hill and who has produced a feature
length masterpiece his first time out.
Set in 1957, a time of sputnik and the political paranoia that went
along with coming in Number Two, The Iron Giant confronts the prejudice
of the time and wraps it all in a heavy duty layer of nostalgia -- for
us old coots. Duck and Cover educational films, cheesy Sci-Fi Horror
films, and Maypo commercials. For those too young to endure a thirty
year trip in Professor Peabody's Wayback Machine, it is the story of
nine year old Hogarth Hughes (voiced by Eli Marienthal) and his
discovery of a "hundred foot tall" robot in the backwoods near Rockwell,
Maine. Hogarth isn't the only person to have seen the Giant. Earl Stutz
(M. Emmet Walsh) An old fisherman who ran his boat into the robot has
called in the Army to investigate this mysterious thing that may be from
Outer Space; may be a Commie, for all we know. The rest of the town
laughs at the old man, equating the sighting to pink elephants, but that
doesn't explain why huge chunks are missing from their cars and
tractors. They look like big bite marks, but nothing could be that big,
right?
Hogarth is a mischievous kidlet. His single mother Annie (Jennifer
Aniston) works as a waitress in town, and that leaves the kidlet with
too much time on his hands. Once he saves the Giant from electrocution
in the high power cables at the local power plant, the story offers
echoes of the old "He followed me home. Can I keep him?" stories. In
this case, Hogarth doesn't tell mom, nor does he tell the incredibly
nosy investigator, Kent Mansley (Christopher McDonald) who has rented
the extra room across the hall. While Hogarth can teach the Giant to
speak (Vin Diesel does the voice) and the ways of right and wrong --
straight from the pages of Action Comics, home of Superman -- he doesn't
have enough metal around to feed the big guy. Enter our final player,
Dean McCoppin (Harry Connick Jr.) a beatnik junk dealer who creates art
out of the scrap metal he picks up for a penny a pound, give or take.
Dean hides the Giant from the U.S. Army, which has come to town at the
behest of Kent Mansley, to destroy that which it fears.
That's the way it was in the '50s. That which we could not identify we
assumed was the enemy. That which was the enemy we threatened to nuke.
And all the while, the air was filled with beat and jazz and the
beginnings of rock 'n' roll music.
Now, don't think the Giant is a warm and fuzzy, new age 90s in the 50s
kind of robot. When Hogarth plays "Atomo" (based on the evil star of one
of his comic books) and aims a toy blaster at the Giant, said Giant
undergoes a metamorphosis that would make any Transformer jealous.
Destructo-Rays, Plasma Energy balls, Vaporizing beams, almost anything
you could have imagined in any 1950s sci-fi epic is at his beck and
call, and only a quick witted Dean keeps Hogarth from meeting his Maker.
More important than any other story element, this sequence is the key
which makes The Iron Giant unique. Hogarth has taught, and the Giant has
learned, that living beings have souls and anything with a soul can
choose to be good or bad.
The Giant chooses to be Superman. Literally. The Army, led by Kent's
boss General Shannon Rogard (John Mahoney), chooses nukes. I've left out
a vital piece of the story which, if revealed, would steal from you the
wonder that you will experience as you experience this most wonderful
piece of work.
Deep down, The Iron Giant ain't no lightweight kidlet fare but it is
totally accessible to the little kidlets sitting near Cranky and even
more accessible to the little kidlet tucked inside all of adults. I've
made no mention of the animation technique because The Iron Giant
achieves what most animators can only dream of, a story so affecting and
characters so real that you forget that you're watching a animated film.
On average, a first run movie ticket will run you Eight Bucks. Were
Cranky able to set his own price to The Iron Giant, he would have
paid...
If you remember the 50s, you're gonna love it. If you were into comic
books or Sci-fi, you're gonna love it. If you're nostalgic for the
"family values" orientation now applied to 50s teevee shows, you're
gonna love it. If you've got little kids, you're gonna love watching
them love it and then you'll get the tape so you can love it all by
yourself.
Even the teen kidlets, who never like anything I do, will love it. But
they'll never admit it.  End of gush.
CrankyCriticŽ is a Registered Trademark of, and Copyright Š by, Chuck
Schwartz All Rights Reserved

Author
Bob Bloom

 The Iron Giant (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Featuring the voices of
Jennifer Aniston, Harry Connick Jr., Eli Marienthal, Vin Diesel and
Christopher McDonald.
 "The Iron Giant" is one of those movies that seem to have come out of nowhere.
 It is a warm and touching animated feature with roots in the science
fiction films and mores of the 1950s, the period in which this feature
takes place.
 This entertaining family feature is based on a book by British Poet
Laureate Ted Hughes, best known as the widower of poet Sylvia Plath.
 It is a simple tale of friendship, love and understanding. Set in Maine in
October of 1957, the story tells of 9-year-old Hogarth who, hearing a
fisherman tell how his boat was sunk by a gigantic metal man, sets out in
the woods to find this wondrous robot.
 As the saying goes, be careful what you wish for, it may come true. Not
only does Hogarth find the 50-foot-tall iron robot, but he also saves its
life.  The metal-eating robot turns out to really be a gentle giant, and
Hogarth decides to find a place where he can hide it so as not to frighten
the local residents.
  being a time of paranoia in the United States, a government agent is sent
to Maine to investigate rumors of flying saucers, Soviet invaders, giant
robots or whatever he can find.
 This is where "The Iron Giant" succeeds brilliantly. Like the live-action
"October Sky," released earlier this year, this movie captures the fear and
loathing for anything un-American that existed during this era.
 Whatever is not American is automatically an enemy and must be destroyed,
was the thinking of the day. And this theme of intolerance is carried over
into "The Iron Giant."
 It is a wholesome, family-oriented feature that will please and amuse
parents and children. One sequence especially will have the baby boomers in
the audience smiling.
 One day at school, Hogarth and his class watch a movie giving them
instructions on how to "duck and cover" in case of atomic attack. If you
remember those air raid drills when you had to crawl under your desk, this
scene will tickle you.
 "The Iron Giant" is a story of friendship, tolerance and knowing who you
are - even if you are made of iron. It's a story with a message, but the
two are interwoven so thoughtfully that you are not hammered over the head
and feel as if the filmmakers are preaching to you.
 The animation is not as sophisticated as some newer features such as
Disney's "Tarzan." "The Iron Giant" has a 1950s comic book look to it,
which is apropos to the story.
 The movie features the voices of Jennifer Aniston as Hogarth's mother; Eli
Marienthal as Hogarth; Harry Connick Jr. as his friend, Dean; Christopher
McDonald as government agent Kent Mansley; and, notably, Vin Diesel as the
giant.
 One complaint about the movie is that it is too white. True, it is set in
Maine in 1957, yet there are no people of color anywhere. Every character
is white. It would not have hurt the film in any way to put some ethnic
faces on some of the townspeople.
 Otherwise, Brad Bird, who adapted Hughes book and directed the film, keeps
the pace lively so as the younger audience members do not get bored. "The
Iron Giant" is a quaint little film, a nostalgic piece of entertainment.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Stephen Graham Jones
The dilemma for all the 'tin men' in literature/media has always been Do I
have a heart or not? From Oz to Star Trek to director Brad Bird's The Iron
Giant. But The Iron Giant is so much more, too. It opens with a meteor (the
Iron Giant, here) hurtling through space, through Earth's atmosphere, and
landing deadcenter in the eye of what looks to be a hurricane off the coast
of Maine. Which is of course Stephen King country, where anything can
happen. It does
The year is 1957. The place is Rockwell--as in Norman, vintage Americana.
And the boy is Hogarth Hughes (Eli Marienthal), only child of single mom
Annie Hughes (Jennifer Aniston), which is to say he's in bad need either of
an imaginary friend or a father figure. As luck would have it, he gets both
and then some, living out every boy's dream of having his own personal,
Optimus Prime. To complicate things, though--or, rather, to allow
things--this robot (Vin Diesel) has a dent in his head which results in
amnesia, which means Hogarth has to train him (not it), teach him all the
cool stuff John Connor teaches the T1000, not the least of which is that the
soul lives on after the body dies (or, it's bad to kill, but not bad to
die). Which yes is important.
But there are more immediate concerns, too: this robot has to eat. A lot.
And his food of choice is metal. Meaning, in the Maine woods, he has to
venture again and again into populated areas, which eventually attracts the
attention of secret government agency man Kent Mansley (Christopher
McDonald), something of a bungler who is initially made out to be a
lantern-jawed Fox Mulder, but soon reveals himself as the Smoking Man in his
younger, animated days. Meaning Hogarth's giant robot is, to him, all his
Cold War paranoia come frighteningly to life. The robot did land in the eye
of a hurricane, after all, and what are hurricanes if not the turbulent
middle ground of opposing convective forces? It's democracy vs. communism,
writ small in the New England of forty years ago. And yes, soon enough
Mansley has his finger on the button, looking to usher us a little deeper
into the Atomic Age.
Playing opposite Mansley, however, is Beat junkman Dean McCoppin (Harry
Connick, Jr.), who agrees to give Hogarth's robot both room and board
(scrapped cars), and--as we all do--eventually falls for this robot which,
although it's in keeping with how robots were 'supposed' to look in the 50s,
is nevertheless animated as being extremely expressive. It's all about body
language, well-placed grunts. King Kong stuff. And of course his mood-ring
eyes, which only go red (mad) in the presence of guns, which is evidently
his (the robot's) original identity surfacing--an identity he'll need when
the army turns against him, as they have to.
But of course that's never been the question, either--whether the robot
would be villified and then given a chance to redeem himself. The bigger
question has been who will step up as Hogarth's father? Mansley is the
initial choice, but his liberal use of chloroform and nuclear arms kind of
puts him out of the running. Leaving the one who, in the 50s, would never
have qualified: Dean, the Beat. As for how The Iron Giant ends, think Fox
and the Hound. It's pretty much the same story, except, whereas Fox and the
Hound is set in the timeless, nostalgic backwoods of Where the Red Fern
Grows, The Iron Giant has a little more sociohistorical context. That
context has a downside, too, though: in the 50s, the common epithets were
'scout,' 'chief,' etc, which we don't use anymore. But The Iron
Giant--because it is trying to be a period-piece--does. And that use almost
comes off as an endorsement of those terms, even though it is the bad guy
Mansley who uses them. In addition, though there's no outright profanity,
there are a few 'what the hell's,' which perhaps today's children don't even
notice anymore. All in all though, and despite the occasional
irresponsibility, the highest endorsement I can give The Iron Giant is that
I'll buy the video when it comes out, so my son can watch it when he's old
enough.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Author
Michael Elliott
DIRECTED BY:       Brad Bird
STARRING (THE VOICES OF): Jennifer Aniston, Harry Connick Jr., Eli
Marienthal, Christopher McDonald, Vin Diesel, John Mahoney, M. Emmet Walsh
WRITTEN BY:        Tim McCanlies
RATED:             PG for fantasy action and mild language
SCRIPTURE
REFERENCES:        Genesis 2:7, Psalms 104:29-30, Psalms 146:4
Moms around the world understand that there is something about stray
animals and young boys.  The words, "Can I keep him?" have been heard by
mothers almost as much as the words, "I didn't do it!"
Stray animals are one thing.  But how would you like your child to bring
home a 50 foot metal robot from outer space?  Such is the dilemma facing
Annie Hughes (voice by Jennifer Aniston, FRIENDS) in the new Warner
Brothers' film, THE IRON GIANT.
Warner Brothers has certainly improved their animated track record with
this delightfully scripted and imaginatively drawn tale of a boy and his
giant friend.  There is something to please every age group in this film.
In fact, in the screening audience (of which I was a part) was a 50/50
mixture of children and parents.  In most instances, the laughter of the
parents drowned out the higher pitched squeals of the younger set.
Hogarth Hughes (voice by Eli Marienthal, JACK FROST) is your average,
over-imaginative American young boy circa 1957, who is always on the alert
for invaders from Mars, or commie spies.  After hearing a noise coming
from his backyard, and seeing a path of destruction leading into the
woods, he goes out to investigate.  He soon finds the source of the
inadvertent destruction.  A 50 foot metal man/robot leaves quite a wake.
Befriending a giant metal-eating robot is relatively easy.  Hiding him is
something else entirely.  With the help of beatnik/junk dealer/artist Dean
McCoppin (voice by Harry Connick Jr, HOPE FLOATS) Hogarth shows great
ability in keeping his new oversized friend a secret.  But it isn't easy.
The government, hearing of strange occurrences in Hogarth's small town of
Rockwell, has sent a representative, Kent Mansley (voice by Christopher
MacDonald, LEAVE IT TO BEAVER) to investigate.    Soon, the entire army
has been called in to destroy what they perceive to be a menace to the
American way of life.
The script by Tim McCanlies (DANCER TEXAS, POP. 81) is based upon the
characters from the British children's story, "The Iron Man."  The story
has been Americanized and set in the '50s in order to capture some of the
paranoia of the times.
On one level, the movie is about Hogarth teaching the giant that everyone
has the ability to choose who or what he will be.  Though designed as a
weapon of great destructive power, the giant can vow, like Superman, to
only use his powers for good.  Director Brad Bird (FAMILY DOG) apparently
pitched the concept of the movie to Warner Brothers by asking the
questions, "What if a gun chose not to be a gun?  What if a gun had a
soul?"
There are other themes running through THE IRON GIANT.  Friendship,
sacrifice, judging by appearances... But integral to the story is the idea
of an eternal soul that lives on after we die.  Certainly this concept
makes for a sweet and happy story, one that is utilized to great effect in
this movie.  But it does not have the support of scripture.
According to God's own Word, there is nothing eternal about a man's soul.
In Hebrew, the phrase, "living soul" is translated from the words,
"nephesh chay" which are more literally rendered, "breathing creature."
Defined by the scriptures, our soul is literally our breath life... which
ends when we stop breathing.
It is the spirit in man, which is a gift of God and distinguishable from
a man's soul, that is of an eternal and divine nature.  Perhaps it may
sound like splitting hairs or engaging in semantics, but keeping the
distinction between spirit and soul is vitally important for one's
understanding.  Failure to do this has led many to the false doctrines of
spiritualism, magic, reincarnation and a host of other erroneous beliefs.
With that one caveat, I can recommend THE IRON GIANT as a fun,
entertaining and enjoyable film suitable for all ages.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Warner Bros.
 Director: Brad Bird
 Writer:   Brad Bird (story) Tim McCanlies (screenplay),
based on the book "The Iron Man" by Ted Hughes
 Cast: Voices of Jennifer Aniston. Harry Connick, Jr., Eli
Marienthal, Christopher MacDonald, John Mahoney, J.
Emmett Walsh, Cloris Leachman
   If your kids are not into heavy metal, there's no better way
to introduce them to the genre than by taking them to "The
Iron Giant."  With a month remaining to the summer, I'll
wager this will iron out as the summer's best family film,
"Tarzan" notwithstanding.  There are benefits for adults as
well.  1) The usual mature stuff is thrown into this
well-written, non-preachy morality tale; 2) the adult
paraphernalia will soar over the head of the small fry but will
glide by so quickly they won't notice that they've missed a
thing; 3) the picture at eighty minutes in length does not
overtax its invitation; 4) best of all, there's no Broadway
soundtrack or icky songs.  The strangest business about this
movie, a circumstance that doesn't bode well for human
actors in this age of digitalized everything, is that when bad
things happen to the title character, you may actually feel like
shedding a tear.  That's how well-developed the big metal
monster is, while at the same time the human, er, animated
people are three-dimensional.  With voices like Jennifer
Aniston's as the concerned mom, Eli Marienthal's as the
principal kid Hogarth Hughes, Vin Diesel's as the Giant and
Christopher McDonald's as the (of course) villainous
government agent, Warner Bros. has on its hands a package
that is well-written, appropriately soundtracked, though with
animation that falls way short of the "Tarzan" density--but
with a genuine story to tell, who cares?
   Brad Bird, who directs the picture which was co-written by
Tim McCanlies from a Ted Hughes book, keeps the action
situated in 1957 for good reason.  The 50's was the duck-
and-cover decade, a time that schoolchildren were convinced
they could not be touched by nuclear weapons as long as
they had a school desk to crouch under.  With the U.S.
government seeing a Communist conspiracy under every rock
and with the possibility that the Iron Giant could be a Red-
created Trojan horse, the Pentagon could not be expected to
restrain itself form using the ultimate weapon on a seemingly
indestructible force.  Or as one agent says, if it's not made in
the U.S., "we'll blow it to kingdom come."  The story takes
place in the picturesque town of Rockwell, Maine, home of
10-year-old Hogarth Hughes (voice of Eli Marienthal) and his
mother Annie (voice of Jennifer Aniston).  From the beginning
we are privy to the boy's interest in pets.  He's had a raccoon
that caused mayhem and his mom will therefore not allow
him to adopt the squirrel he has smuggled into his mother's
coffee shop.  One night, Hogarth goes into the woods to
check out a noise.  Confronting the 100-foot giant that some
local seamen had reported seeing, he is at first afraid, but
when he cuts the power to an large electric generator that the
giant was in the process of eating--thereby saving the big
guy from the shock of his life--the two become friends. 
Hogarth and a beatnik artist neighbor whose work consists of
selling scrap iron and turning some of the product into
sculptures are ultimately pitted against the forces of
government agent Kent Mansley (Christopher McDonald) and
the U.S. army--who are determined to cut the behemoth
down.
   Throughout the tale, we become convinced that its writers
are politically anti-violence, whether the savagery consists of
attempts at destroying the friendly Frankenstein monster or of
shooting the local deer for pure sport.  The Iron Giant himself
can represent any human beings who are treated in our
society with less than toleration.  Interestingly enough,
Hogarth teaches the townspeople to call the Giant HIM and
not IT--perhaps the key moral point that the picture makes--
since we human beings have the tendency to depersonalize
anyone we hate to make ourselves appear less culpable
when attacking.
   Comic touches abound throughout, both the visual imagery
(the way Hogarth's eyeballs frequently rotate when he is
thinking deeply or reacting to stimuli) or verbal (as the beatnik
Dean McCoppen, voiced by Harry Connick Jr., whines that he
can easily sell his scrap iron "but when I turn it into art, I
can't give it away").
   The film's greatest success lay in audience reaction.  At
the sneak preview screening I attended, which was populated
by a massive colony of small fry, there was not a peep in the
audience--a situation which is all too rate with the
constituency of a mature adult film.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Brad Bird.
Voices: Eli Marienthal, Vin Diesel, Jennifer Aniston, Harry Connick Jr., 
Christopher McDonald, John Mahoney, Cloris Leachman, M. Emmett Walsh.
1999 - 85 minutes.
Rated PG (for brief, mild profanity and mature themes).
Reviewed August 1, 1999.
The praise Warner Brothers' new animated film, "The Iron Giant," has been 
getting is phenomenally positive, with a few critics who have gone as far as 
to call it a classic, the best animated film in a long time, and WB's first 
successful venture into the world of animation (after dismal results with 
"The Quest for Camelot" and "The King and I"). Thus, going into the movie 
theater was a hopeful, relatively assured experience; I was ready to like, 
and embrace, the film, just as long as it was as special as everyone has been 
saying. It isn't, and actually surprised me in how lacking the whole film was 
in almost every respect, despite its more mature themes than the usual 
animated flick. For me, at least, WB's losing streak continues, even if it is 
worlds above the dreadful "The King and I."
Based on the 1968 novel by Ted Hughes, "The Iron Giant" begins as a giant 
robot from outer space crashes into the ocean during a hurricane, but is able 
to reach land unscathed. Rumors begin to circulate around the tiny New 
England town of Rockwell, Maine, circa 1959, about a huge creature that a 
sailor allegedly glimpsed while out on the waters. Hiding within the tall 
forest directly above the town, the robot, named the Iron Giant, is equipped 
with weapons all over his body, basically programmed as a destroying machine, 
but due to a dent in his head caused from falling to Earth, he doesn't 
remember this. When 10-year-old Hogarth Hughes (voiced by Eli Marienthal) is 
home alone one night watching a scary movie (his mother, voiced by Jennifer 
Aniston, sometimes has to work late at the local diner), the television 
abruptly goes to static and, investigating, Hogarth discovers that their 
antenna has been eaten, and a large path has been made into the woods behind 
his house. Following it, he meets the Iron Giant, whom he is frightened of at 
first until he realizes he is a kind robot that just needs a little 
discipline. This unlikely pair soon become close buddies, but Hogarth fears 
their friendship will be threatened if anyone else finds out about him, 
especially when oily government agent Kent Mansley (voiced by Christopher 
McDonald) sets out to find the unidentified being from another planet.
While it can be appreciated that "The Iron Giant," directed by Brad Bird, 
features several adult themes that you do not usually find in animated films 
(including serious talks about death, faith in God, and the nuclear 
holocaust), and we are thankfully spared singing characters and cute (read: 
annoying) animal sidekicks, the film is disappointing and flawed for many 
reasons. For one, the movie feels overlong while you are watching it, even at 
a scant 85 minutes, but in retrospect, virtually nothing occurs outside of 
the major storyline between the robot and the young boy. Unfortunately, on 
this level alone, even amidst its tranquil nature and innocence, the film is 
almost shameful in its extreme similarities with the 1982 classic, "E.T." 
Replace a small alien with a giant robot, tranport the time period back some 
22 years, and turn the three-dimensional, well-developed human actors into 
one-dimensional, thinly-written animated characters, (mix well) and you've 
practically got the same movie.
The character of Hogarth's mother is an example of a wasted, thoroughly 
undealt-with creation. Working as a waitress and obviously struggling to 
raise her son on her own, a possible subplot is briefly brought up in which 
you expect to learn more about her and her personal problems, but apparently 
director Bird felt that anything revolving outside of the cliched robot 
storyline would make children squirm. I beg to differ, however, since Bird is 
ambitious enough to discuss several heavy topics, and send out worthy 
anti-gun and anti-violence messages, and the children in the audience didn't 
make a peep. Aside from the robot himself, the film is refreshingly 
realistic, and because of this, children will be more likely to relate to the 
characters and situations, while adults will appreciate the distinct period 
flavor, including how, during the Cold War, school children were instructed 
to climb underneath their desks in case a nuclear bomb was to hit. If the 
film had gone a little bit further in portraying this particular era, 
including using, perhaps, an array of popular '50s tunes to underscore the 
goings-on, it might have been more enjoyable on this level.
"The Iron Giant" is not a complete washout (it's a little too aspiring for 
that), but remains a missed opportunity. The film strains to follows the 
cookie-cutter basics of the plot, in which "boy-meets-robot, 
boy-befriends-robot, 
boy-must-bid-farewell-to-robot-when-his-safety-is-threatened," and not once 
strays from this well-worn path. The entrance of agent Kent Mansley is 
irritating and a throwaway stock villain character, while the other 
supporting animated figures play as more of an afterthought. Finally, young, 
precocious Hogarth must briefly say goodbye to his beloved friend in the 
supposed-to-be-heart-tugging climax, but all I could really think about at 
that moment was, "I've seen this all before, and to much more powerful 
effect." Animated feature or not, "The Iron Giant" attempts to stray from the 
beaten path of Disney, but really, who is Warner Brothers kidding? I'll take 
Disney's superior animated entertainment, "Tarzan," over this any day of the 
week.
     - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
       Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
Akiva Gottlieb
In the past 5 years, animation has come a long way; or so it
seems. New formats, including high-tech computer animation are
threatening to take the glamour away from Disney's yearly
"masterpiece".  However, it is a film like "The Iron Giant", without
any sidekicks or musical interludes, that I think can make the most
change for the genre. "The Iron Giant" is a wonderful film for adults
and kids that just happens to be animated. It is the story of a boy
named Hogarth(what?)  who, in 1950's Maine, discovers an iron giant
made by a foreign country as a weapon. However, this being the movies,
the iron giant turns out to have a heart of gold, and learns to
triumph over his impulses. Christopher McDonald voices a government
agent who is after the iron giant because he believes he can cause
harm, and Jennifer Aniston is Hogarth's single mother. While the story
is kid-friendly, adults will enjoy the precise reworking of small-town
1950, where people fear the dropping of "the bomb" and learn to "duck
and cover". Despite being a fine film, "The Iron Giant" feels a lot
like a tired rehash of "E.T." But director Brad Bird has a lot of
creative vision, and writer Tim McCanlies("Dancer, Texas Pop. 81")
makes the dialogue sound real; a rare quality in an animated film.
"The Iron Giant" is a successful experiment that might have been
better, but its heart is in the right place, and it truly is a film
that adults will enjoy just as much as the kids. Take a chance and see
this flick.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Author
Akiva Gottlieb
In the past 5 years, animation has come a long way; or so it
seems. New formats, including high-tech computer animation are
threatening to take the glamour away from Disney's yearly
"masterpiece".  However, it is a film like "The Iron Giant", without
any sidekicks or musical interludes, that I think can make the most
change for the genre. "The Iron Giant" is a wonderful film for adults
and kids that just happens to be animated. It is the story of a boy
named Hogarth(what?)  who, in 1950's Maine, discovers an iron giant
made by a foreign country as a weapon. However, this being the movies,
the iron giant turns out to have a heart of gold, and learns to
triumph over his impulses. Christopher McDonald voices a government
agent who is after the iron giant because he believes he can cause
harm, and Jennifer Aniston is Hogarth's single mother. While the story
is kid-friendly, adults will enjoy the precise reworking of small-town
1950, where people fear the dropping of "the bomb" and learn to "duck
and cover". Despite being a fine film, "The Iron Giant" feels a lot
like a tired rehash of "E.T." But director Brad Bird has a lot of
creative vision, and writer Tim McCanlies("Dancer, Texas Pop. 81")
makes the dialogue sound real; a rare quality in an animated film.
"The Iron Giant" is a successful experiment that might have been
better, but its heart is in the right place, and it truly is a film
that adults will enjoy just as much as the kids. Take a chance and see
this flick.
a capsule review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Author
Susan Granger
The summer's best surprise is Brad Bird's fun-filled, superbly
crafted animated family film. Based on Ted Hughes' children's book,
"The Iron Man," the concept combines the sensitivity of Steven
Spielberg's "E.T." with a gleeful contemporary sensibility.  Set in
peaceful, picturesque Rockwell, Maine, in 1957 - at the time of the
Russian satellite Sputnik - the story revolves around the friendship
of a nine year-old boy, Hogarth Hughes (voiced by Eli Marienthal), and
a gigantic robot who fell into the ocean from outer space. They meet
one night when his single mother (voiced by Jennifer Aniston) is
working late and Hogarth hears a noise outside. Curious, he follows a
trail of broken fences and downed trees into the woods where he finds
a 50' tall metal monster tangled in electrical wires. Feeling sorry
for the enormous beast, he turns the power off, thus saving its
life. Knowing his mother's aversion to pets, he tries to keep the
gentle Iron Giant (voiced by Vin Diesel) hidden but the creature's
voracious hunger for metal (cars, trucks, TV antennas, railroad
tracks) arouses the suspicions of a sneaky, trigger-happy Government
Agent (voiced by Christopher McDonald). Hogarth's only ally as the
precarious situation escalates is a cool beatnik scrap-metal
dealer/artist (voiced by Harry Connick Jr.) who tells him, "You are
who you choose to be."  That's a key phrase in the heartfelt, honest,
intelligent script, which also works as a political allegory without
getting heavy-handed, teaching lessons about tolerance and
sacrifice. And Michael Kamen's musical score is subtle yet evocative.
On the Granger Movie Gauge of 1 to 10, "The Iron Giant" is a charming,
whimsical, magical 10.  It's absolutely impossible not to love "The
Iron Giant" - a definite MUST SEE!

Author
Jerry Saravia
The 1950's is an era that has always fascinated me, and so any film that
focuses on such a long forgotten time and place of innocence and sensibility is
one I look forward to. Earlier this year, there was "October Sky," a film
centered on an ambitious boy's dreams of rockets in a West Virginia mining
town. "The Iron Giant" is the latest film set in the 1950's when the Cold War
had just started, and a farm boy befriended a giant metal robot unaware of its
potential harm. 
The film begins with an innocent, likable kid named Hogarth Hughes who
desperately wants a pet, but his single mother (Jennifer Aniston) will not
allow it. One day, the antenna at the house fails to work, and Hogarth notices
that something gnawed and bit its way to his house. He searches in the middle
of the woods near the power station and finds a giant metal robot wrestling
with the electrical power lines. The boy is mystified and in awe of this giant
creature - he slowly observes how calm it is and befriends it. Of course, how
can he explain to his mom that his new pet is over twenty stories high? He
tries to hide it in the barn, but it manages to make the other parts of its
body function on their own. In one hectic scene, Hogarth pants and squirms
trying to push the robot's hand out the bathroom window while his mother knocks
on the door. 
"The Iron Giant" has a little bit of everything. There are mad generals,
insanely clumsy government agents, lazy beatniks, Mad magazines, disbelieving
townsfolk, Atomic Age training films, junkyards, etc. Just about anything
associated with the 1950's is presented here with no shame (those training
films are hilarious), as well as various rock songs from that period. 
"The Iron Giant" also has charm and pathos to spread, and it does it
convincingly with the simple metal giant who is also a weapon sent from the
enemy (possibly the Russians?). It is friendly, jovial, learns how to speak and
eats anything metal, but it can also fire missiles when threatened to defend
itself. The advertising for "The Iron Giant" and the look of the robot
strangely reminded me of the short Nazi animated film shown in "The Rocketeer"
- a combination of shock and terror at the possibility of something threatening
our world during a time of political chaos. 
"The Iron Giant" is often preachy, reverential, and its anti-gun message could
not come at a better time (but it could be relatively more subtle than
proclaiming that guns are bad). There are the typical stereotypes and cliches
but in a sense, none of it matters. For an animated film that is as
well-designed and clever as this one, this is entertaining, boisterous, simple
fun thriving on simple pleasures. "The Iron Giant" taps into our dreams of
finding a genuine friend in the form of something extraordinary, and it
delivers.    
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with questions, concerns or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at
Faust667@aol.com

Author
Greg King
THE IRON GIANT (PG).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Brad Bird
Stars: voices of Jennifer Aniston, Harry Connick jr, Eli Marienthal,
Vin Diesel, Christopher McDonald, John Mahoney, James Gammon, M Emmett
Walsh, Cloris Leachman
Running time: 86 minutes.
The spirit of ET runs through this charming story of an
unlikely friendship between a young boy and a giant mechanical robot
from space.  The Iron Giant is based on a story originally written by
Britain's Poet laureate, the late Ted Hughes, after the death of his
wife Sylvia Plath.  The story was then turned into a rock opera by Who
guitarist Pete Townshend, which explains his involvement as one of the
producers of this marvellous and enormously enjoyable animated tale.
The film is set in 1957, and is suffused with the Cold War
paranoia, suspicions of Russian supremacy in space, and fear of both
nuclear war and invasion from another planet.  The action of the story
takes place in the picturesque sea side town of Rockwell, which
immediately brings to mind both the famous illustrations for the New
Yorker magazine as well as the town of Roswell, famous for its UFO
landing.
Ten year old Hogarth Hughes (voiced by Eli Marienthal) has
been raised with a healthy imagination, fuelled by a diet of horror
movies and fantasy comics, and has a penchant for adopting stray pets.
One night while home alone he ventures outdoors to investigate the
sudden interference with his tv reception.  Suspecting an alien
invasion, he cautiously follows a trail of debris into the forest.  He
finds the eponymous robot trapped by electrical cables, and rescues
him.  Thus begins an unusual friendship between an impressionable
young boy and a friendly, but misunderstood, alien creature who has no
memory of its origins.
When a suspicious and sinister government agent (voiced by
Christopher McDonald, currently seen in tv series Family Law, etc)
comes to investigate reports of strange nocturnal sightings in the
area, Hogarth conspires with local junkyard owner and aspiring artist
Dean McCoppin (Harry Connick jr) to hide the robot.  But when man's
basic instinct and its natural urge to destroy that which he does not
understand takes over, the scene is set for a climactic showdown
between the friendly robot and the army bent on saving the world, at
any cost.
Although the animation is not quite in the same league as
recent state of the art features like Toy Story and its ilk, The Iron
Giant is still very good, and a lot of care has been taken in creating
the look of the film.  Unlike some Disney animated features, which
espouse old fashioned family values, The Iron Giant is surprisingly
modern in some of its attitudes - e.g. Hogarth's mother (voiced by
Friends star Jennifer Aniston) is single and works as a waitress in a
road side diner.
 
Director Brad Bird, a veteran of animated series The Simpsons
and King Of the Hill, explores some important themes and issues here,
and the film is full of positive values.  Bird even manages to include
a strong anti-guns message, as well as lampooning some of the nuclear
warning messages prevalent during the height of the Cold War.
Even the characters have more depth than one normally
encounters in a cartoon, and the story is surprisingly moving and
touching.  This is largely due to the wonderful script from Tim
McCandlies, who gave us the underrated Dancer, Texas a couple of years
ago.  Bird has assembled a strong vocal cast, including John Mahoney,
Cloris Leachman, and Vin Diesel (from Saving Private Ryan), who
provides the voice of the iron giant.
As with films like A Bugs Life, Toy Story and Babe, animated
films are not just purely aimed at children anymore.  They are not
patronising to adult audiences.  Instead, the best children's films
have a strong story, wonderful characters and explore important ideas
and themes that have crossover appeal to broader audiences.  Along
with the wonderful Stuart Little, The Iron Giant provides superb
entertainment for audiences of all ages during the holiday season!

Author
David Sunga
Written by Brad Bird and Tim McCanlies, based on a Ted Hughes book
Starring: The voices of Eli Marienthal, Jennifer Aniston, Vin Diesel, Harry
Connick, Jr., and Christopher McDonald
Synopsis: 
In this animated feature a giant, destructive alien robot (voice of Vin
Diesel) lands on Earth and suffers amnesia. The killing machine is
befriended by a young boy named Hogarth (Eli Marienthal) who along with his
beatnik acquaintance Dean (Harry Connick, Jr.) teaches the iron behemoth
about friendship and human free will. Unfortunately for Hogarth and his new
metal friend it is the height of the Cold War period in US history, so the
US Army and a gung ho government agent are bent on tracking down and
destroying the giant.
Opinion:
Great casting. FRIENDS waitress Jennifer Aniston is back in the familiar
costume, only this time she's a waitress who's also a 1950s single mother.
Crooner Harry Connick, Jr. is digging the beat again, but not as a
musician. In THE IRON GIANT Connick, Jr. plays a Beat generation artist.
Both Aniston and Connick slide into their roles and improvise effortlessly.
The artwork's pretty interesting, too. It's late 50s style, and if you went
back in time and showed the cartoon at a 1960s elementary school assembly
it wouldn't look a bit out of place.  
THE IRON GIANT plays low key on the emotions, yet it's a solid story
because of timeless ingredients that anyone can appreciate: friendship,
moral choices, action and the big showdown. Bring the family. 
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
The latest from Warner Brothers animation, "The Iron Giant", is a simply 
told fable that resonates with charm and humanity.  Based on the book "The 
Iron Man" by British poet Ted Hughes, the movie takes a new direction from 
Brad Bird, himself a former animator.  Bird's vision gives purpose and 
completeness to the movie, and the art style and direction strike the viewer 
with subdued power.
The opening shot shows Sputnik circling the Earth; the camera zeros in on 
the planet and zooms down into a storm, the title reading "Somewhere off the 
coast of Maine, 1957."  The animation style also hearkens back to decades of 
cartoons past, especially when the main character Hogarth Hughes (voiced by 
Eli Marienthal) darts into a diner where his mother Annie (Jennifer Aniston) 
waitresses.  When Hogarth's newly-caught pet squirrel escapes its box, we 
meet the beatnik-like Dean McCoppin (Harry Connick Jr.).  Dean is a starving 
artist who runs the local scrap yard, using metal to make his outré 
sculptures.  (As in many works of literature featuring a child, Hogarth's 
father is absent, only a photo visible of him holding a pilot's helmet.  Was 
he lost in Korea or some other conflict involving the Red Menace?)
A lot is made of Cold War politics.  One of Hogarth's comic books is 
actually called "The Red Menace," and government agent Kent Mansley 
(Christopher MacDonald) exhibits paranoia inspired by the times.  What 
sparks concern around this area of Maine is a report of some sort of giant 
from outer space.  Something is taking bites out of cars and silos and 
tractors, and this something Hogarth Hughes meets when one night his mother 
works late and he roams outside.  At a power station in the woods he 
encounters an enormous metal man that snacks on girders.  The giant suddenly 
gets caught in high-tension lines and, trapped, agonizes in apparent pain 
and alarm.  Frightenend, Hogarth first runs and then circles back to shut 
off the power, a la the mouse pulling the thorn from the lion's paw.  Later 
Hogarth discovers the creation is friendly, and the two form a friendship 
that Hogarth is careful to keep unknown to his mother and the town.
Because the giant needs metal for nutrition, Hogarth helps by directing him 
to Dean's scrap yard, and it's inevitable that Dean discovers the awesome 
visitor.  Bird does a wonderful job in portraying the shocked reaction, 
which elicits laughs from the viewer.  But Agent Mansley has rented a room 
from Mrs. Hughes, and while she is working late one evening, he plays the 
noxious role of sinister surrogate father.  He will get information about 
this giant at any cost, even is he must threaten taking Hogarth away from 
his mother.  The remainder of the film follows many of the alien fables we 
have seen already.  The innocent and misunderstood outsider is hunted.  
Fortunately, "The Iron Giant" plays variations on the theme, and the 
personality of the giant makes us feel much closer to him than to many of 
the "monsters" we have previously loved.
We witness some wonderfully silly routines, as when the giant imitates a 
crazy face and wiggly fingers done by Hogarth.  The giant is mimetic by 
nature, and he seems to have amnesia:  He does not know why he crashed to 
Earth.  Some of the most captivating moments occur when this gargantuan 
being is used for extremely human purposes.  Dean has him hanging entire 
wrecked cars from the arms of a mobile, while Hogarth plays with him 
hilariously, the giant spinning like a space-age merry-go-round.  The 
humanity evinced by the Titan - especially his relationship with Hogarth and 
later with Dean - is what endears him to us.  Further, just his appearance 
is cool.  Fifty feet tall, eyes glowing and rotating, squarish jaw like 
something out of an old Bugs Bunny, the giant takes over the screen whenever 
he appears.  His voice is supplied by Vin Diesel, and it is somehow enhanced 
into a raspy sigh.  Another feature that acts as remarkable foreshadowing is 
the ability of his mechanical body to reassemble itself if the giant is 
injured.  Even better is his ability to fly, the fiery thrust coming from 
the soles of his mammoth feet.
An important dimension the story carries is anti-violence.  Because Hogarth 
is gentle with the giant, and teaches him lessons about life, the giant acts 
gently.  "Souls never die" and "Killing is bad" are among the crucial bits 
of knowledge the robot picks up.  What leads to the climax of the narrative 
is most fascinating:  We see the metal man's eyes narrow down to red and 
angry apertures when he is threatened, and we wonder what will happen if he 
does not lapse into his forgetfulness.
The script could do without occasional bad language, including several 
vulgarisms and uses of God's name.  Although there is some violence toward 
the end, I'd venture that the PG rating would change to a G without these 
unnecessary epithets.  A viewer should not expect animation of the quality 
of the latest Disney offerings, though the clear lines and retrospective 
style get the job done with solidness.  And the direction compares with that 
of the best animated movies of recent years.
Our whole family attended the film, and all of us were laughing and moved by 
turns.  I would recommend "The Iron Giant" for any audience, and for what 
it's worth, I plan to buy the video when it's released.


Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
PLOT:
A giant metal man falls from the sky and befriends a small town kid whose
imagination and enthusiasm rank highly in his repertoire of qualities.
Unfortunately for the friendly duo, the United States government of the
1950s does not take too well to "alien" beings, and attempts to violently
get rid of the giant monster.
CRITIQUE:
Hmmm...a serious animated movie with a message? Well, I'm sure it could work
but this one sure didn't do much for me. The ending of this movie was nice
with the deeper meaning and emotional touches, but for most of its run time
I found myself bored, searching for something-anything, nice music, some
humor or even a touch of romance or action, to make the film interesting to
watch. It wasn't to be. This E.T.-type flick moved along at such a neutral
pace that I kept wondering if anything interesting was ever going to happen!
Well, nothing really did and since I don't consider myself much of a 50s
connaisseur, or a sci-fi comic book enthusiast, there wasn't very much in
this films' ho-hum story that engaged me in any way. Of course, matters
weren't helped by the fact that the only so-called "bad guy" in the film was
completely one-dimensional and that the animation was obviously not intended
to impress. Think of it as an after school television cartoon program
elongated to match the length of a full feature and that's pretty much all
you have here. Much like the BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, I am not exactly sure what
all the hype about this movie is about either.

Author
Shay Casey
Why do so many children's films treat their target audience with utter
contempt? Too many of those who write or direct for children's movies assume
that the kids just can't handle serious, thoughtful discussions on
meaningful issues. "The Iron Giant," which was directed and co-written by
Brad Bird, late of such animated series as "The Simpsons" and "King of the
Hill," assumes that not only can children handle such discussions, but that
they can do so while being entertained at the same time. "The Iron Giant"
holds absolutely no contempt for the young people in the audience, making it
a film that's enjoyable for both children and adults alike.
Hogarth Hughes (voice of Eli Marienthal) is a spirited young lad who lives
with his hard-working single mother, Annie (Jennifer Aniston), in a small
town in Maine. After staying up late and watching scary movies on a night
his mother is away, Hogarth treks out into the forest to investigate what
has stolen his antenna and ruined his TV reception. He comes across a giant
robot (Vin Diesel) from space that eats metal for food. After saving the
robot, nicknamed the Iron Giant, from electric shock, Hogarth befriends the
creature and takes him in as a pet of sorts. Because of damage he suffered
upon landing, the Giant has forgotten what his original mission was, so he
just follows Hogarth around like a lost puppy. Realizing he can't just keep
the Giant in a barn all the time, and that the Giant needs food, he takes
him to a junkyard owned by Dean (Harry Connick Jr.), an eccentric artist who
assembles sculptures out of scrap iron in his spare time. It soon becomes
apparent that Dean and Hogarth can't keep the Giant a secret forever,
because a government spook named Kent Mansley (Christopher McDonald) has
been brought in to investigate mysterious sightings in the surrounding
forest area and considers the Giant a threat to national security. He
suspects Hogarth knows something about the Giant, and takes up residence in
Hogarth's house as a lodger. Meanwhile, the Giant begins to exhibit ominous
behavior that suggests he was built to be a weapon of some kind.
"The Iron Giant" is exactly what family films ought to be, because it doesn'
t talk down to its audience. The story is simple, very simple, about an
alien being that drops out of the sky and befriends a young boy. It's very
similar to the Spielberg classic "E.T.,' and such comparisons are actually
deserved in the case of "The Iron Giant." The film holds many of the better
elements of Spielberg's film, such as the ability to be sentimental without
turning sappy. The film delivers several serious messages, the most
important of which is one's ability to choose one's own fate. Hogarth
teaches the Giant to go against his programming and become what he wants to
be: a hero. The final sequence is touching and appropriate, though I won't
give it away, I will say that very few will be disappointed.
The animation, while not up to Disney standards (what could be, after
"Tarzan"?), is good enough to make you forget you're watching a cartoon. The
Giant is computer-animated, while the human characters are all hand-drawn
the old-fashioned way. The characters' faces are done quite well, drawn
realistically enough to make the personalities credible, but the features
are exaggerated so as to allow for the cartoonish expressions that provide
for comic relief. Fine voice work is turned in by young Eli Marienthal as
Hogarth, and Jennifer Aniston is surprisingly convincing as his waitress
mother. Harry Connick Jr. does a nice characterization as Dean, and I really
enjoyed the voice work of John Mahoney (of TV's "Frasier") as an Army
General called in by Agent Mansley. Unlike several cartoon features, each
character is actually a developed personality, rather than a stereotype, and
is actually integral to the plot, rather than being a superfluous
comic-relief sidekick (a cliché  Disney still hasn't ditched). Dean, for
example, could have been a stereotypical beatnik (his character profile
seems to suggest that), but he is presented as a character with real
emotions, thoughts, and motivations. Even the heavy, Agent Mansley, is not a
villain who does bad things simply because he wants to, but out of his own
fear and paranoia. A lesser animated feature would have drawn up paper-thin
stereotypes and figure the kids won't mind, but "The Iron Giant" has clearly
put a little work into making the characters real, and it pays off.
The film isn't only around to deliver heavy-handed messages, though. It's
also very funny, and the humor is of the kind that both children and adults
will enjoy. The scenes in which Hogarth teaches the Giant to do certain
things, such as dive into a pool, are handled well, and director Brad Bird
clearly has a sense of comic timing, having worked on "The Simpsons" for
many years. A sequence where Hogarth and Mansley attempt to "outlast" one
another by trying to stay awake is very nicely timed, and also extremely
clever. The film even takes some jabs at America's nuclear paranoia during
the early stages of the Cold War, satirizing the lame safety films shown to
grade school students that tell them to "duck and cover" in the event of a
nuclear attack. "The Iron Giant" has much more of a satirical edge to it
than most family films, and the edgy humor is actually quite refreshing.
Instead of seeing people get bonked on the head, we get well-timed, clever
gags that seem to have required some imagination to come up with.
When you get right down to it, "The Iron Giant" is no more than the story of
a boy and his robot. The story is so straightforward, so quaint, that it
ultimately becomes charming. Though I enjoy the complex plotting of film
noir as much as the next person, when it comes to family entertainment,
simple is the way to go. It's akin to one of those bedtime stories your
father told that had you hanging on his every word, but it's not the story
that sets the film above others of its kind, but rather the elements that go
into the story, namely real characters and thoughtful dialogue, which "The
Iron Giant" has in spades.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Author
Steve Lipson
Upon reading the poster tagline for "The Iron Giant," the latest animated 
feature from Warner Brothers, one may be forgiven for assuming that the 
movie is intended strictly for children. After all, what more should one 
expect from a movie that attempts to grab audiences' attention with such a 
sensationalistic headline as "It came from outer space!" Only upon watching 
this highly-accomplished film does one realize how unfair to Brad Bird's 
debut picture this tagline really is; I was even reminded of the injustice 
done to "Citizen Kane" by its similarly-worded slogan: "It's terrific!"
While I do not mean to put "The Iron Giant" in the same league as Orson 
Welles's classic, I nevertheless feel that the advertising campaign for 
Bird's film trivializes its serious intentions. For "The Iron Giant," though 
vastly entertaining for anyone in the audience, possesses themes and lessons 
as meaningful for adults as they are for children. The depth of the movie 
should come as no surprise given the film's pedigree: it is based on the 
book "The Iron Man" by the late British poet laureate Ted Hughes. And as is 
to be expected from such auspicious beginnings, the great strength of the 
film lies in its story.
Admittedly, the basic plot of "The Iron Giant" sounds simple enough: In 
1957, at the height of the competition between the Americans and the Soviets 
in the Cold War, a meteorite crashes in the ocean near the quiet Maine town 
of Rockwell. Some locals speculate that the debris came from the Russian 
satellite Sputnik, but what actually fell to Earth was a 100-foot tall alien 
robot. The adventurous local boy Hogarth Hughes (voice of Eli Marienthal) 
discovers the giant in the woods, saving his life in the process. The two 
overcome the language barrier to become friends, although this period of 
bonding is made more difficult by the need to find metal to feed the Iron 
Giant (Vin Diesel)  and the desire of Hogarth to keep his large new friend 
secret from his mother Annie (Jennifer Aniston). More ominously, Hogarth 
soon discovers that he must hide the robot from Kent Mansley (Christopher 
McDonald), a government agent sent to Rockwell to investigate the crash of 
the meteorite and the mysterious sightings by townspeople. To ward off any 
possible threats to the security of the United States, Kent has the entire 
arsenal of the U.S. Armed Forces at his disposal. Hogarth's only ally in his 
efforts to save the Iron Giant from imminent destruction is the beatnik 
artist Dean McCoppin (Harry Connick, Jr.), who reluctantly allows the robot 
to hide out on his property.
At first, this plot outline with its youthful hero and dastardly villain 
may seem like it resembles the descriptions of countless other animated 
films released over the years. But what distinguished "The Iron Giant" from 
other fare are the serious issues raised and stressed in the screenplay. 
Brad Bird and Tim McCanlies, who adapted Ted Hughes's book for the screen, 
wisely chose not to update the story to modern times. Keeping it in 1957 
allows them to explore the ramifications that these incidents in Maine would 
have on a country and a people frightened by the Cold War. In the process, 
"The Iron Giant" delves into themes still highly relevant to today's times: 
the danger of guns, the folly of nuclear war, the difficulties of 
communicating across cultures. And the great achievement of this film lies 
in its ability to make these issues meaningful to people of all ages. On the 
topic of nuclear war, adults will find themselves uneasily laughing at a 
recreation/ parody of those "Duck and Cover" videos of the 1950's that 
explain how to survive a nuclear attack; children will be struck by a line 
during the climax that succinctly encapsulates the utter destructiveness of 
nuclear weapons and how not even the people that launch them are spared. And 
the movie does not pull punches, either, at another problem as pressing 
today as it was in 1957: xenophobia. Kent and many others in the movie feel 
that anything alien is dangerous and must be destroyed; this fear of 
foreigners extends not just to extraterrestrial beings, but to foreigners on 
our own planet. Like most of the other important issues raised in "The Iron 
Giant," Bird does not treat this point in a heavy-handed manner; in fact, 
Kent most explicitly reveals his xenophobia in a line as humorous as it is 
ominous.
This sense of humor is a facet of the film that should not be neglected. In 
addition to being very effective in its action and dramatic scenes, "The 
Iron Giant" is a very funny movie. Comic highlights of the film include 
Hogarth's efforts to hide the robot from his mother, especially as he tries 
to say "Grace" at dinner, and the attempt of the Iron Giant to imitate his 
friend doing one of his favorite summertime activities. Never does Bird 
allow the important messages of his film to undermine its basic 
entertainment value.
"The Iron Giant" delivers what audiences have come to expect from most good 
animated features this side of "South Park": a story that captivates both 
children and adults. The term "animation" has unfortunately come to pick up 
negative connotation in some quarters, from people who deride animated 
features as kiddie cartoons. But Hughes's book virtually cried out for 
animated treatment. By filming the movie in such a way, Bird avoided the 
pitfall that plagues so many summer movies: having the special effects 
overwhelm the story and characters. Instead of directing a movie that 
basically forces the audience to marvel at the latest advances in 
computer-generated imagery, Bird has created a film in which the marvel of a 
100-foot robot walking on Earth can be experienced, but then the audience 
moves on, to focus on the relationship between Hogarth and the Iron Giant 
and the issues that the screenplay explores. And it cannot be denied that 
the use of animation allows for some undeniably impressive effects, as in a 
neat scene where the robot reassembles himself after being separated into 
pieces. But never do such images seem as if they are inserted for their own 
sake, rather than to further the story.
Brad Bird, formerly a director for the television show "The Simpsons," has 
fashioned a movie that combines the best aspects of both animated and 
non-animated features. In fact, Bird's film, aside from its screenplay, 
possesses artistic merits that rival those of most any motion picture. 
Admittedly, the animation in "The Iron Giant," while quite good, is not up 
to Disney standards. But Bird compensates for this minor flaw by a mastery 
of the visual and story-telling techniques universal to success in the 
medium of film. His use of light and shadow in particular stood out for me. 
Throughout the movie, one observes impressive lighting effects that add to 
the mood of a scene: the mother's angry look emphasized in the car 
headlights she stands in front of, a flashlight beam swooping through the 
dark, hazy patches of light filtering through the trees in a mysterious and 
idyllic forest setting. Later, in the Hughes house, the menace represented 
by Kent Mansley is rendered very clear as he emerges from the dark to 
confront Hogarth in his room. Seeing the very sharp contrast between light 
and shadow on Kent's face made me think nostalgically back to black and 
white film-making, when such high-definition lighting effects could be 
created with ease and effectiveness. But color animation can create such 
ominous scenes at times when their live-action counterparts cannot.
With his use of sound, too, Bird demonstrates an awareness of the lessons 
learned from non-animated settings. In the typical Disney animated movie, 
one's enjoyment of the film is often marred if one does not like the songs 
in it. But "The Iron Giant" is no musical; like most live-action films, the 
songs  are played in the background of the action. And Bird even improves on 
the way most directors employ their soundtracks. Too often in non-animated 
features, the director adds a popular song as filler or as a transition 
between scenes. Bird does not fall into this trap; in one notable scene, for 
example, Kent's investigation into the mystery of the robot does not stop 
though a song that is not part of the action is playing. The audience still 
understands what is going on and we still laugh; the movie continues 
unimpeded despite relying for its effect on silent comedy and drama. By 
merging the freedom and creative potential of animation with the time-tested 
techniques of live-action film story-telling, Bird has fashioned a truly 
memorable picture.
Perhaps best of all, one's satisfaction with "The Iron Giant" is not 
hampered by a disappointing conclusion. The film ends as it should: somber 
enough so as not to trivialize the important issues it raises, yet happy 
enough to please children. And after the end credits roll, the movie leaves 
one with a lot to think about and talk over with one's family. "The Iron 
Giant" leaves unresolved such issues as the robot's origin and purpose, and 
the religious intentions of the film. At first, I considered such ambiguity 
to be one of the few weaknesses of the film. But upon further reflection, I 
realized that leaving us with such uncertainty may have been just Bird and 
McCanlies's intention. The movie raises a lot of points for discussion in 
which the film-makers' message is clear, as in their attitude to nuclear 
war. But many questions remain open for us to come to our own conclusions: 
If extraterrestrials exist, why might they want to visit Earth? Does the 
Iron Giant (as a sentient robot) have a soul? In the end, "The Iron Giant" 
is a thought-provoking motion picture that provides solid entertainment for 
all ages; perhaps this is the highest compliment one can give to a family 
film (or any movie for that matter). But I cannot resist one more 
commendation. Because I was not pleased with the original advertising slogan 
for the film, I have come up with my own tagline: "It's terrific!"


Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
The Iron Giant (1999)
Eli Marienthal, Jennifer Aniston, Harry Connick Jr., Vin Diesel, 
Christopher McDonald, James Gammon, Cloris Leachman, John Mahoney, M. 
Emmet Walsh. Executive producer, Pete Townsend. Produced by Allison 
Abbate and Des McAnuff. Music by Michael Kamen. Screen story by Brad Bird.
 Screenplay by Tim McCanlies, based on the book "The Iron Man" by Ted 
Hughes. Directed by Brad Bird. 87 minutes.
Rated PG, 4.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
During a Los Angeles press junket last May, a group of reporters, in town 
to cover another movie, were invited to a late evening screening of "The 
Iron Giant." By the time we were herded into the theater, most of us were 
tired and less than enthusiastic at the prospect of sitting through a 
feature-length cartoon. But 87 minutes later, as the end credits began 
scrolling up the screen, we broke into a warm round of applause and spent 
the ride back to the hotel happily jabbering like little kids. Since 
returning home, I've seen the movie two more times.
Films of this caliber don't come along very often. With a smart script, 
expressive characters and a skillful mix of humor and sentiment, "The 
Iron Giant" offers as many pleasures for adults as it does for children. 
Here's another treat: unlike traditional Disney-style cartoons, the 
feature has no wacky sidekicks or musical numbers. Hallelujah!
Inspired by British Poet Laureate Ted Hughes' book, "The Iron Giant" is 
set in 1957 America, during the height of Cold War paranoia. When a local 
fisherman enters a diner in picturesque Rockwell, Maine, blathering about 
a giant metal creature that came crashing out of the sky, no one believes 
him. No one except feisty 9-year old Hogarth Hughes (Eli Marienthal), the 
only child of single mother Annie (Jennifer Aniston), who works in the 
eatery.
That night, Hogarth goes exploring in the deep woods and encounters a 50-
foot tall robot (Vin Diesel) attempting to eat the town's power plant. 
When the massive creature bites into a transformer and gets zapped, 
Hogarth comes to the rescue and a friendship is forged. Following the 
crash and the near-fatal electric sandwich, the giant has lost his memory,
 so Hogarth begins to teach the powerful behemoth the ways of his new 
world. 
Fearful of how others would react to the robot, Hogarth seeks the 
assistance of beatnik sculptor/junkyard owner Dean McCoppin (Harry 
Connick Jr.) in hiding the mechanical being. Matters grow more 
complicated with the arrival of Kent Mansley (Christopher McDonald), a 
smarmy, suspicious and very determined government agent investigating the 
situation. Then, during a play session with a toy ray gun, Hogarth learns 
that the giant might not be as gentle as he thought. 
Writer and director Brad Bird ("The Simpsons," "King of the Hill") says 
he changed the time period of the story to the '50s because "America was 
at a crossroads. We were learning to live with the atom bomb; the space 
race was just beginning; paranoia was at a high; and all of this got into 
the movies of the time... giant ants and mutated Martian men. That's a 
pretty funny response to all of those influences. So if you're going to 
have a story about a human boy who befriends a metal man, it's fitting to 
put it into the context of the fear that existed at the time."
Good thinking. A great part of "The Iron Giant's" charm comes from the 
retro drawing style and well-placed period details. Hogarth watches 
cheesy monster movies on his black and white TV, schoolchildren are 
subjected to ludicrously cheerful "duck and cover" films in the classroom 
and newspapers echo the sentiments of the era with headlines that scream 
"DISASTER SEEN AS CATASTROPHE LOOMS." Worries about the ever-present "Red 
Menace" are echoed in everything from comic books to the film's palette - 
- note the color change when a key object shifts to weapons-mode.
Michael Kamen deserves praise for his witty and stirring score, and for 
selecting evocative music without resorting to the same tired golden-
oldies employed in so many other period films.  
The look of the robot also fits the '50s setting. With a dome-shaped head,
 eyes that resemble searchlights, an angular jaw and massive body plates 
held together by an elaborate array of nuts, bolts and gears, he is 
simply the coolest robot ever. The filmmakers do a fine job making the 
giant seem simultaneously childlike and awe-inspiring. They also adroitly 
mix sound effects and visuals to give us a palpable sense of the 
incredible weight and bulk of the creature. 
For a film as simply drawn as "The Iron Giant," the key characters' faces 
are remarkably expressive, particularly those of Hogarth and his beatnik 
buddy Dean. Between Hogarth's chipped front tooth and exasperated eye 
rolling and Dean's wry glances from his lowered sunglasses, the two are 
more believable than most flesh and blood performers. Voicing the pair, 
Eli Marienthal and Harry Connick Jr. hit all the right notes to complete 
the illusion.
Due to the story structure, Annie is relegated to the background, which 
is a shame because Jennifer Aniston gives the character real vitality. I 
also regretted seeing only lily white faces in Rockwell. For a movie as 
thoughtful and humane as this, the lack of ethnic diversity was 
disappointing.
Thankfully, those were about the only disappointing aspects of the film. 
The production shines because the creative team made sure they had a rich,
 emotionally satisfying story to match their drawings. With lots of 
laughs, a dandy message, a strong sense of wonder and sentimentality that 
never becomes cloying, "The Iron Giant" is a classic. Get ready to feel 
like a kid again.

Author
Frankie Paiva
Being released on the same weekend as five other new movies The Iron Giant is
and will become one of the best films you are not likely to see. It's a shame
that such a critically acclaimed movie can't do well at the box office, but the
public likes it's mainstream trash.
Hogarth Hughes is an adventurous young boy living in Rockwell, a cozy seaside
town in Maine. It's 1957 and Sputnik has just been sent into orbit by the
Russians, so when a crazed drunk is out on his boat and sees what he calls a
metal monster the townspeople joke around with him at first. When cars start
getting eaten, and power lines destroyed, the people begin to wonder.
When Kent Mansley (a government agent) comes to investigate he discovers
Hogarth's fake gun near the power plant and questions him about it, he says he
doesn't know anything but Mansley figures he knows more than he's letting on.
The truth is, Hogarth is hiding the robot at the local scrapyard where Dean
McCoppin, the owner, is keeping him hidden in a shed. He's beginning to form a
bond with the metal man and doesn't want to see him hurt. When Kent discovers
that there is a robot, he is scared it's from another country and is going to
annihilate us all, and he sends for reinforcements.
While bearing the strong resemblance to E.T., the film is still in a class of
it's own. Finally, an animated film with no songs, no fake love stories, and no
stupid sidekicks. Instead this is a wonderful film with a good message,
(putting in the fact that guns actually kill people is a great message for a
children's film) plus the film is filled with lots of gags and jokes aimed
directly at adults too. 
The film has received horrible box office earnings, and is likely to be put
with other critically loved comedies such as Rushmore, Election, Go, and Dick.
This is a magical film that can be viewed again and again. So what are you
waiting for? Go out and see this film now! Don't delay, call MoviePhone and get
tickets for The Iron Giant, which gets *** 1/2 stars.

Author
Michael Dequina
_The_Iron_Giant_ (PG) **** (out of ****)
When I first saw the trailer for Warner Bros.' latest animated feature
_The_Iron_Giant_, the thought that immediately came to mind was "_E.T._
with a robot."  Little did I know just how much truth would lie in that
statement.  Rather than a cheap ripoff of that family classic,
_The_Iron_Giant_ is a newly-minted one in its own right, spinning a yarn
that is fun, funny, and, most crucially, poignant and inspiring--much
like Steven Spielberg film of 17 years ago.
Any film, whether live action or animated, lives or dies by what's on
the page, and the key ingredient in _The_Iron_Giant_'s success is the
script by Tim McCanlies and director Brad Bird, based on the book
_The_Iron_Man_ by Ted Hughes.  A basic plot synopsis--youngster Hogarth
Hughes (voice of Eli Marienthal) finds a giant alien robot (Vin
Diesel)--fails to do justice to what the story entirely encompasses.  It
is on this simple plot thread that McCanlies and Bird hang a number of
well-developed themes: friendship, choosing one's identity, and a staunch
anti-violence stance.
_The_Iron_Giant_ may sound overly preachy and heavyhanded, but that
could not be farther from the truth.  These themes are subtly and
seamlessly integrated into the story, as is the film's witty sense of
humor.  The film takes place in 1957, and Bird not only captures the look
and atmosphere of that bygone era, but also its state of mind--most
notably the post-WWII fear of an atomic holocaust, which is mined for
some good satiric laughs (a sugarcoated classroom film on what to do in
the event of a bombing is especially funny).  That sense of paranoia also
goes a long way in explaining character motivation, namely that of
government Kent Mansley (Christopher McDonald), who believes the Iron
Giant is a weapon of war that must be destroyed.
Smart touches such as those may fly over the heads of the children in
the audience, but the action and humor of _The_Iron_Giant_ will not fail
to delight them and the adults in attendance.  Young and old can also
share in the enjoyment of the believable characters.  The youthful
exuberance and curiosity of both Hogarth and the Iron Giant are
incredibly endearing, a quality bolstered by the vocal performances of
Marienthal and Diesel.  McDonald's Kent is an amusingly hissable baddie,
and Jennifer Aniston and Harry Connick Jr. disappear nicely into their
roles as Hogarth's mother and beatnik friend Dean, respectively.
The animation in _The_Iron_Giant_ won't soon erase memories of the
intricate camera moves featured in Disney's _Tarzan_, but it is a huge
step up from Warner Bros.'s recent animated embarrassments,
_Quest_for_Camelot_ and the awful _The_King_and_I_.  The clean yet simple
art style is a better fit for this story than any more technologically
advanced approach would be; it lends a nice comic book-like air to the
proceedings.  (Not coincidentally, the Iron Giant's resemblance to a
character in one of Hogarth's comic books is a prominent point.)  The
simplicity doesn't come at the expense of expressiveness, however, for
all the characters' faces--even the Iron Giant's--vividly register on the
emotional scale.
The strength of those emotions took me quite by surprise by the close of
_The_Iron_Giant_, when I realized just how much I grew to care about
these characters and their fates.  With its wit and adventuresome spirit,
_The_Iron_Giant_ is a superbly entertaining film for the entire family,
but what makes it transcendent--much like _E.T._--is how deeply it is
able to touch its audience.
Michael Dequina
twotrey@juno.com | michael_jordan@geocities.com |
jordan_host@sportsmail.com | mrbrown@iname.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site:  http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline:  http://www.HollywoodHotline.com
on ICQ: #25289934  |  on AOL Instant Messenger: MrBrown23


Author
Mr. Bryan Frankenseuss Theiss
  Despite the decade's reputation for depravity and lowest common denominator
crappiness, the 90's have actually produced a whole slew of intelligent and
superbly crafted family films. From wickedly imaginative fantasies like The
Nightmare Before Christmas and James and the Giant Peach to more down to earth
dramas like Harriet the Spy and Fly Away Home, a wide range of high quality
films have brightened up what might otherwise be known as the John Hughes
kicked-in-the-balls period. Now there's a new movie to add to the modern family
classics category, a movie that will also take its place among the best all
around films of the '90s and the greatest animated features ever made. And to
my delight, this movie happens to be about a giant robot.
  Iron Giant delivers as a giant robot film, depicting all manner of robotic
adventure for its wonderful, retro-styled title automaton. You get to see the
robot flying, fighting, carrying people, shooting beams out of its eyes -
everything you'd expect. But for this film, that stuff is only the surface -
even if it doesn't need to be. Most likely, Iron Giant is not what you expect.
It could easily join Toy Story and Babe in a trilogy of warm, compassionate
fairy tales with universal appeal. Like its predecessors, Iron Giant is a
nearly flawless masterpiece of cinematic storytelling. The basic premise - boy
befriends giant robot from space - is an old one, but it comes out feeling like
something entirely unique. It is fortified with healthy doses of humor and
invention that will appeal to adults even more than to children. At the sneak
preview screening I attended, the audience was mostly made up of adults who
seemed to think they were just treating their small children to the latest
kiddy flick. They ended up laughing loud and hard from beginning to end. 
  Most importantly, Iron Giant continues the Toy Story/Babe tradition by
instilling a strong sense of humanity and emotion into a character we wouldn't
have imagined could be so moving. I never in a million years would have
expected to care about a talking pig the way I do Babe, so that was one of that
film's most surprising qualities. It also seems a bit odd to get tingles from a
clunky action figure of a spaceman super hero, but that's just what happens
when I watch Buzz Lightyear realize he's only a toy and try to fly anyway. 
  I did expect to like the giant robot of Iron Giant, because I'm the sort of
guy who likes that sort of thing. But I couldn't have hoped for such a moving,
Frankenstein's-monster-like personality inside this cool-looking mass of metal.
All of the characters, even the humorously xenophobic villain, have enough
dimension and humanity to them to make the story inescapably compelling. At one
point in the movie it occurred to me that the giant might live out a certain
tragic tradition of giant robot stories, and suddenly I found myself crying.
Now that I didn't expect.
  Unlike recent non-Disney hits like Anastasia and Prince of Egypt, it's
actually difficult to think of Iron Giant (which was produced by Warner
Brothers) in terms of Disney animation. Despite being an all ages animated
fable, Iron Giant is a completely different animal. I like Tarzan, and the way
it sticks its toes just a little bit outside the borders of the Disney formula.
I think it is more dramatic and emotional than most Disney films, and I
appreciate the lack of musical sequences. When compared to Iron Giant, though,
Tarzan seems laughable and by-the-numbers. Iron Giant doesn't skewer animation
tradition, but it doesn't follow formula at the expense of story. You don't get
the feeling that this is a commercial endeavor, where merchandising and
marketability are first or even second priorities. They're not even a factor at
all. This is just good old fashioned storytelling that seems to be effortlessly
universal in its appeal.
  Iron Giant isn't a musical either, but unlike Tarzan it doesn't bow to the
Toy Story inspired Middle-Aged-Rock-Crooner-Replaces-Show-Tunes formula. The
story takes place in the '50s, and most of the music (besides Michael Kamen's
mythic score) is period source music that usually wafts out of some distant
radio, like in the kitchen of the café where young Hogarth's mom works. We're
talking sound design more along the lines of Jaws than Beauty and the Beast. It
helps to give the film a realistic, live action feel. The atmosphere is
somewhat akin to that of Kiki's Delivery Service - a magical animated fantasy
that manages to depict reality a little more convincingly than many live action
films. 
  (It is significant to note that producer Pete Townshend recorded a rock opera
concept album based on the same Ted Hughes book the film is based on. Keeping
this in mind, it's hard to believe the filmmakers were actually able to fulfill
their vision. Call me pessimistic, but I think Disney would have forced songs
on them.)
  Tarzan, despite its fairly serious tone (I am still very fond of the scene
where Tarzan kills a leopard and hoists its corpse above his head) is saddled
by a couple of cartoony comic relief sidekicks who occasionally let their zany
antics and references interfere with the story. They're tame by Disney
standards, so they don't seem that bad in Tarzan. 
  But Iron Giant has no comic relief characters or wacky sidekicks. At the same
time, I can't think of a Disney movie that made me laugh half as hard as Iron
Giant. Instead of having characters in the story whose job it is to be funny,
the main characters themselves are funny and face funny situations. Director
Brad Bird helmed early episodes of The Simpsons and helped establish many of
the show's longstanding storytelling techniques, so perhaps it shouldn't be
surprising that the many funny scenes in Iron Giant are masterfully executed.
  It is surprising, though, or at least refreshing, how genuinely warm and
human the movie is. I think a lot of people will see that it's a non-Disney
animated feature and expect the kind of saccharine pseudo-sweetness they get
from movies like Balto or the sinister works of Don Bluth. You know, the movies
where shots of cute animals or sad orphan girls batting their eyelashes are
what passes for emotion. Hogarth is the real thing - a believable and likable
child protagonist. You can relate to him because he's smart and self-reliant
and likes to watch monster movies. 
  In his Family Dog episode of Amazing Stories, Bird displayed a knack for
depicting realistic children and getting great performances out of child voice
actors. This tradition is continued with Hogarth, who is superbly portrayed by
Eli Marienthal. In most ways, Hogarth behaves just like a normal kid, reading
comic books and playing in the lake. To me he seemed just like the kids who
were in the theater, telling each other that the giant wouldn't harm anyone
because "he's a good guy." But while Hogarth seems like a normal kid, it also
seems perfectly natural when he forms unusual friendships and performs acts of
genuine heroism. I think a lot of filmmakers, and not only those who work in
animation, could learn from the characterization in this movie.
  Hogarth's relationship with the robot begins with a situation thematically
similar to the unforgettable pitbull rescue in Babe: Pig in the City. Hogarth
encounters the huge metal creature stomping through the woods and he thinks -
maybe even correctly - that it's trying to kill him. Hogarth gets his chance to
escape when the metal monster trips into a web of power lines. Seeing it writhe
in pain, Hogarth perhaps sees that there is something human about the giant,
and he risks himself to save it from electrocution.
  This act of kindness is the beginning of a relationship in which the boy
helps the machine realize that he can be more than a weapon. The giant turns
out to be almost more of a boy than Hogarth, so much so that he idolizes
Superman. Even if Iron Giant were a shoddy piece of filmmaking, I'd probably be
suckered just by that wonderful notion: the powerful giant robot from outer
space who likes to play Superman. Lucky for me (and everyone who's not a
sucker) that's just one of many beautiful touches on this animated masterpiece,
which is easily my favorite film of the year so far. It's an instant classic
which will surely be remembered alongside the likes of the aforementioned
Kiki's Delivery Service, Toy Story and Babe - movies that make you smile just
thinking about them.
"I write rhymes so fresh I try to bite my own verses." --Tash

Author
R.L. Strong
WARNER BROTHERS PRESENTS  A BRAD BIRD ANIMATED FILM  "THE IRON GIANT"  FEATURING
THE VOICE TALENTS OF  JENNIFER ANISTON  ELI MARIENTHAL  HARRY CONNICK JR.  VIN
DIESEL   CHRISTOPHER McDONALD   JAMES GAMMON JOHN MAHONNEY AND M. EMMET
WALSH       MUSIC BY MICHAEL KAMEN  EDITED BY DARREN T. HOLMES   ASSOCIATE
PRODUCER   JOHN WALKER   CINEMATOGRAPHY BY MARK DINICOLA   ART DIRECTION ALAN
BODNER   PRODUCTION DESIGN MARK WHITING EXECUTIVE PRODUCERS  PETE TOWNSHEND  &
JOHN WALKER   SCREENPLAY BY BRAD BIRD AND TIM McCANLIES BASED ON THE NOVEL AND
STAGE PLAY BY TED HUGHES   PRODUCED BY ALLISON ABBATE   DIRECTED BY BRAD BIRD
Animation! An art form that has been on a continuing ebb and flow in motion
picture history. Once solely the domain of Walt Disney, pen and ink drawings
have come back to many studios but not always with the same success. With the
release of Warner Bothers' "THE IRON GIANT", we have a chance to view a solid
piece of work that rivals anything done by the former.
The year is 1957, and all of American is aware and watching as Sputnik circles
the globe. But one night a meteorite bursts through our atmosphere, crashing
into the ocean off the coast of Maine. Earl Stutz (voiced by M. Emmet Walsh) is
fighting to stay afloat in his fishing boat as a rough storm tosses him.
Searching frantically for the lighthouse, he crashes into a huge monolith.
Looking up he sees something with two burning searchlights. Knocked of his boat
by a crashing wave, the old man is thrown into the sea. He wakens on the rocks
just below the lighthouse.
Hogarth Hughes is a nine-year-old boy, being raised by his single Mother, Annie
(Jennifer Aniston). Hogarth loves monster movies and comic (as most any kid
does), and is giving to telling tall tales to avoid punishments for poor
judgment. One night while watching a scary movie on television (against his
Mother's wishes), he hears a noise from outside. Suddenly the reception of the
television goes out. Hogarth runs to his bedroom, and looking out the window
discovers that the antenna has been broken off. He then sees large footprints
leading from his house into the forest. Thinking that an invasion from outer
space has begun, Hogarth grabs up his Space Cadet regalia and sets forth in
search of the invader.
Hogarth stumbles through the woods, following the trail of broken trees to an
electrical station. As he approaches, the ground starts to rumble, trembling
with heavy blows. Suddenly a huge 100 foot metallic man appears above the trees.
Hogarth runs, just avoiding being crushed by the giant's feet. The steel
behemoth stares down at the power station, eating first the security fence and
then trying to eat one of the power conduits. Electricity bolts out from all
directions. The giant falls back against the high-tension lines, becoming
entangled. The surge of electricity causes the giant to shake and shudder in
anguish. Hogarth cowers as the giant smokes and burns in the electrical storm.
Finally, feeling some sense of remorse, runs to the main cut off switch and
pulls the circuit closed. The giant falls back unconscious, crashing  to the
ground. Hogarth, frightened and amazed runs home to tell his Mother. Meeting her
at the edge of the forest, she scolds the boy for leaving home so late at night
and takes no heed of his tall tale.
The next morning, Hogarth returns to the forest in an effort to photograph the
giant. Waiting for long hours, sleep overcomes him. Finally Hogarth wakens and
finds that his bait (a sheet of corrugated steel) is missing. He turns to leave
and discovers the sheet of steel behind him. He slowly raises his gaze to see
the Iron Giant standing above him. Laid out nearby is the cut off switch from
the power plant. Hogarth realizes that the Giant understands the boy had rescued
him. Hogarth now has visions of being a super hero, and a secret friendship is
begun. And it's a secret that doesn't remain one for very long.
Director Brad Bird, who cut his teeth directing episodes of  'The Simpson' and
'King of the Hill' has produced one of the most enjoyable 'boys tales' ever to
grace the screen. His attention to detail is wondrously complete. The character
designs are both charming and engaging to a degree that we haven't seen since
the classic shorts by Chuck Jones. In fact the whole design of the film could be
seen as a loving tribute to the style and wit of Chuck Jones and Bob Clampett.
The script by Bird and Tim McCanlies is rich in both character and subtext.
There is an honest to goodness feel of the 1950's in this film that it almost
seems to be a product of that era and not a current production. That is not to
say that the animation is stilted or of poor quality. On the contrary, the
animation of "The Iron Giant" is some of the best animation we've ever seen
outside of the Disney Studios. The movements of all of the characters is finely
detailed and beautifully controlled, but never in a way that makes one forget
they are watching animation. The idea of realistic movement is not the point
here. But great character animation and detail to expressions and design are.
The inclusion of Computer animation is so seamless as to be (at times) confused
with the traditional methods. A wonderful and charming alliance or technology
and art.
The cast assembled for the voices of the characters are all remarkable deft at
portraying they're parts. Most effective are Harry Connick Jr. as the beatnik /
junkyard artist Dean McCoppin. His delivery of his lines is so on target that
you forget the actor and absorb the character he portrays. Kudos as well to
Christopher McDonald as Government Agent Kent Mansley, a performance as manic
and inspired as anything done by Mel Blanc. And too much cannot be said about
the performance of Eli Marienthal as Hogarth Hughes. The tone and nuance of this
performance is so on key that if the Academy ever decides to dedicates an award
to voice actors, Mr. Marienthal should surely be up for a nomination.
Based on the marvelous Children's Book "The Iron Giant" by the late Ted Hughes,
Brad Bird's adaptation is a rich and enthralling film. Full of rich animation
and characterization, along with strong moral questions about friendship and
identity. And there is so much depth to the film that adults can take away as
much, if not more from the viewing, as any child can. Absolutely one of the
summer's best surprises, as well as one of this years best films.
On a scale of one to five, 'The Iron Giant' rates full five stars. A wonderful
film that will continue to entertain and enchant both young and old alike, for
years to come. Absolutely, a Classic!
Copyright Š 1999 R. L. Strong
Nothing in this article may be quoted or re-printed without the expressed
written permission of the author.
--
Visit the Dungeon:
The Dungeonmaster's Cornucopia of Film
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Makeup/5594/reviews/main.html

Author
Jamey Hughton
More MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton at:  http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
Do yourself a favor. Skip Inspector Gadget, a special-effects filled
junk heap with no redeeming qualities whatsoever, and see The Iron Giant
instead. This film successfully juggles a wide-range of humor, emotions
and family fun to translate into great entertainment for kids and adults
alike.
Don't be turned off by Warner Bros. previous animated outings. Both
Quest for Camelot and The King and I were enormous financial and
critical flops, creating a questionable future for non-Disney animated
features. The Iron Giant, with an astonishingly mature and well-written
script, manages to defy all odds. Look past the appearance (which may
look mediocre after the visual feast of Tarzan), and you'll be delighted
to find a movie that is memorable, sweet and genial.
The story, although taken largely from ET, manages to succeed on
virtually all levels. It tells the story of young Hogarth (voice of Eli
Marienthal) and his discovery of an enormous metal man that crash lands
near the town of Rockwell, Maine. Hogarth knows he must keep him a
secret, especially from his mother (Jennifer Aniston) and other citizens
of Rockwell. The giant (who is given speech, perfectly, by Vin Diesel)
is originally a horrifying sight, but Hogarth comes to realize that his
newfound friend is more kind-hearted than he is threatening. One
problem: he eats metal (namely cars and tractors), and providing
adequate sustenance for him becomes a difficult task. Luckily, there is
a kindly junkyard owner (Harry Connick Jr.) nearby, and after the
initial shock he allows the giant to hide out on the premises.
But there is always, always someone out to do no good in a film like
this. In The Iron Giant, the antagonist is a devious slimeball named
Kent Mansely (Christopher McDonald), a government agent investigating a
mysterious lead in Rockwell. Mansely rents the extra room at Hogarth's
house, and is frequently questioning the boy about what he knows. While
his character is strictly by the books, McDonald does an extremely
commendable job as the run-of-the-mill sleazeball, bringing Mansely to
humorous life with tactical and well-spoken precision.
The Iron Giant teaches valuable lessons, and is surprisingly successful
at it as well. Hogarth educates the giant about death, spirit, and most
importantly: that `guns are bad.' In one of the film's very few
disappointments, some of these lessons are discarded in the finale in
favor of a military battle. Still, the film has an overwhelming heart
and a sense of good nature that shines through every scene, even if the
story occasionally relies on formula.
The animation in The Iron Giant is perhaps the only noticeable defect.
Certain close-up shots of important details could have been handled with
better proficiency. But, in comparison to Warner's earlier animated
work, this is an impressive step forward. Although The Iron Giant's
visual appearance may seem sub-par in comparison with Disney, it is
actually very well executed. And as for the written content, well, this
is a real nice surprise. There is effective drama and wonderful humor
that both children and their parents can enjoy. While the younger
viewers marvel at the giant's movements and overall sweetness, adults
will find themselves involved in the story and touching character
relationships. And there is, indeed, some nicely distributed laughs that
everyone will enjoy.
There is a lot to admire in The Iron Giant. The subject matter,
occasionally, meets and even surpasses that of Tarzan, despite the fact
that Disney has the obvious edge. This is a good, wholesome family film
that should please viewers of all ages, with one of the more appealing
alien costars ever to appear on the big screen. He may be a giant heap
of metal, but the iron giant is more human than any character you may
ever encounter.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
.......................

Author
Lars Lindahl
"The Iron Giant" (***1/2) (out of four stars)
Directed by Brad Bird
Written by Brad Bird and Tim McCanlies
Starring the voices of  Eli Marienthal, Vin Diesel, Jennifer Aniston, Harry
Connick Jr., Christopher McDonald, John Mahoney, James Gammon, Cloris Leachman,
M. Emmet Walsh 
"The Iron Giant" is a great achievement in feature length animation. It is one
of the few this decade to simultaneously teach a valuable lesson, entertain all
ages, and accurately reenter an era of America's regretful past. The best part
about this film is that it actually captures a number of distinct emotions and
characters of our recent past half a century ago. Through the reaction to the
entrance of this foreign giant, paranoia and trust battle each other out and
determine the fate of the situation. This battle creates an intense,
depressing, and humorous outcome. The stable balance of these three factors
makes "The Iron Giant" so special. It contradicts the spreading trend of just
using animation to create wacky and unimaginable characters. The characters
most definitely have existed in this time of American history and "The Iron
Giant" uses this reality to create real emotions and understandable decisions
from both perspectives. The film is also an argument that the government is
mainly to blame for the Cold War. By making the army and a government agent the
villains, the film shows that America is fighting America. One part of this
country did not blow situations out of proportion and examined them before
making decisions. Another part of this country decided before they examined
that anything foreign or new was a threat to the country. A number of times the
film tells the giant (and the audience) to choose who they are for themselves
without outside interference. "The Iron Giant" mainly is an argument against
the use of violence to solve issues. It asks the question of who to follow in a
time of crisis, yourself or the mass majority (in this case the government and
army). 
These messages are given within the plot which is mostly formulaic except for
its fantastic, heart pounding ending. This is not to say that formulaic is bad.
"The Iron Giant" can be easily compared to "E.T." and equals it in its process
of story telling and lesson teaching. The story takes place in a small town in
Maine during 1957, a time when nuclear attacks were feared and B-horror movies
thrived. A number of spoofs involving the culture of the time are cleverly
added into the script which should entertain adults who grew up during that
time period. A young boy, Hogarth Hughes, (Eli Marienthal in a wonderful vocal
performance) discovers an iron giant (Vin Diesel) near his town and develops a
secret friendship with it. Hogarth teaches the giant how to say basic words, he
teaches him that killing is bad and death should be natural, and he teaches him
to behave like superman protecting the innocent citizens from danger. However,
this relationship is endangered when the army sets out to destroy it no matter
who gets in the way. Christopher McDonald, who always seems to play the bad guy
nowadays, voices Kent Mansley, the man determined to bring the robot down at
all costs by calling in the army once he receives evidence.  
This film proves that animated feature length films can definitely appear on a
film critic's top ten list of movies of the year. Its spectacular ending wraps
together a large amount of the Cold War. The paranoia, the control of the
government, and the fear of foreigners entering the home front. The animation
in the film also deserves credit for its great story telling. Brad Bird
masterfully uses close ups and long shots in a number of scenes. He focuses on
a close up, then slowly blurs it out and closes in on an image farther away.
This style of drawing is very effective because it makes the scenery more real
and as a result makes the content more believable. "The Iron Giant" is the best
animated film since "The Lion King" and it deserves even more credit because it
does not have the comfortable cushion of Disney marketing and advertising. A
wonderful film only held back by some hackneyed lines and scenes. The positives
greatly outweigh the negatives in every category. 

Author
Ross Anthony
A weapon in the form of a large robot with a big appetite for metal falls to
Earth from outer space.
Without the gun part, this movie would play so much like every other
alien-falls-to-Earth story we've seen, that one could hardly get too excited
about it. Child finds alien, teaches alien to speak, hides alien from
government that wants to kill it ... you know the rest. There's even a super
cliche, slightly slanted scene where the robot learns to appreciate nature
by connecting with a deer in the woods.
But, "Iron Giant" is a gun and he's got a pertinent choice to make. When the
army comes to blow him away, will he fight back with all his alien might? No
one would blame him ... he'd certainly have the right to defend himself. Or
would he consider all he had just learned about the magic of life and decide
to use his power in some more "humanitarian" (though metallic) kind of way?
This is an important concept to have set before our kids (and a good
reminder for us, too): 1) You are powerful. 2) You can use that power
destructively or constructively. 3) Which are you going to choose?
Of course, the slant of this particular picture is the more selfless choice.
In fact, less than subtle messages like: "If you're good you have a soul"
and "It's not bad to die, but it's bad to kill" and "Souls don't die" and
"Guns kill" are the nuts and bolts of the story.
The animation is more in the old style which befits this 1950's tale. The
giant itself is charming. The voice talent hit their marks, Harry Connick
Jr. standing out as the most interesting, while a fair Tim Allen
sound-a-like speaks for the ornery FBI agent hassling our Iron Giant's small
friend.
Despite the fact that "Iron Giant" is more of a relationship (child buddy)
film than an animated action flick, kids will absolutely love it and they'll
be going home chewing on a valuable chunk of "heavy mental" of their own.
Voices: Jennifer Anisten, Harry Connick Jr., Eli Marienthal, James Gammon,
Vin Diesel.
Screenplay by Tim McCanlies, Based on book by Ted Hughes.
Produced by Allison Abbate and Des McAnuff at Warner Brothers.
Rated PG.
Kid's Grade..........................A+
Adult's Grade..........................B+
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com
